Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Article 4. Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act

§ 34-1-401.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act”.

History.

2016 ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2017.

Effective Date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 60 § 4, makes the act effective January 1, 2017. Approved March 4, 2016.

§ 34-1-402.
Definitions.

As used in this act unless the context otherwise requires:

“Document” means information that is:

Inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and retrievable in perceivable form; and

Eligible to be recorded in the real property records maintained by the county clerk.

“Electronic” means as defined in W.S. 40-21-102(a)(v);

“Electronic document” means a document received by the county clerk in an electronic form;

“Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol or process attached to or logically associated with a document and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the document;

“Person” means as defined in W.S. 40-21-102(a)(xii);

“State” means as defined in W.S. 40-21-102(a)(xv);

“This act” means W.S.

34-1-401

through

34-1-407

.

History.

2016 ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 60 § 4, makes the act effective January 1, 2017. Approved March 4, 2016.

§ 34-1-403.
Validity of electronic documents.

If a law requires, as a condition for recording, that a document be an original, be on paper or another tangible medium or be in writing, the requirement is satisfied by an electronic document satisfying this act.

If a law requires, as a condition for recording, that a document be signed or originally signed, the requirement is satisfied by an electronic signature.

A requirement that a document or a signature associated with a document be notarized, acknowledged, verified, witnessed or made under oath is satisfied if the electronic signature of the person authorized to perform that act, and all other information required to be included, is attached to or logically associated with the document or signature. A physical or electronic image of a stamp, impression or seal need not accompany an electronic signature.

History.

2016 ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 60 § 4, makes the act effective January 1, 2017. Approved March 4, 2016.

§ 34-1-404.
Recording of documents.

A county clerk who implements any of the functions in this section shall do so in compliance with rules promulgated by the department of enterprise technology services pursuant to W.S.

34-1-405

.

A county clerk may:

Receive, index, store, archive and transmit electronic documents;

Provide for access to, and for search and retrieval of, documents and information by electronic means;

Convert paper documents accepted for recording into electronic form;

Convert into electronic form information recorded before the county clerk began to record electronic documents;

Accept electronically any fee that the county clerk is authorized to collect;

Agree with other officials of a state or a political subdivision thereof or of the United States on procedures or processes to facilitate the electronic satisfaction of prior approvals and conditions precedent to recording and the electronic payment of fees.

A county clerk who accepts electronic documents for recording shall continue to accept paper documents as authorized by state law and shall place entries for both types of documents in the same index.

As used in this section, “paper document” means a document received by the county clerk in a form that is not electronic.

History.

2016 ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 60 § 4, makes the act effective January 1, 2017. Approved March 4, 2016.

§ 34-1-405.
Administration and standards.

The department of enterprise technology services shall promulgate rules in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act to implement this act.

The department of enterprise technology services in adopting rules pursuant to this section shall consider:

Standards and practices of recording offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this act;

Technology used by recording offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this act;

The most recent standards promulgated by national standard setting bodies, including the Property Records Industry Association;

The views of interested persons and governmental officials and entities;

The needs of counties of varying size, population and resources; and

Standards requiring adequate information security protection to ensure that electronic documents are accurate, authentic, adequately preserved and resistant to tampering.

History.

2016 ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 60 § 4, makes the act effective January 1, 2017. Approved March 4, 2016.

§ 34-1-406.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

2016 ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 60 § 4, makes the act effective January 1, 2017. Approved March 4, 2016.

§ 34-1-407.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This act modifies, limits and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, section 7001 et seq. of title 15 of the United States Code but does not modify, limit or supersede section 7001(c) of title 15 of the United States Code or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 7003(b) of title 15 of the United States Code.

History.

2016 ch. 60, § 1, effective January 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 60 § 4, makes the act effective January 1, 2017. Approved March 4, 2016.